Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-201.02
Restriction on private practice of law.

The Attorney General and all permanent deputy and assistant attorneys general shall not engage in the private practice of law for compensation or lobbying for compensation.

Laws 1984, LB 826, § 1.